District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.45

Repealed

Books and records; requirements for right to examine and make extracts therefrom; liability for refusal of right.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 197, ch. 269, § 45
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 241, Pub. L. 86-106, § 10
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.45.
1981 Ed., § 29-345.
1973 Ed., § 29-920.